District of Columbia statutes.
22-4251

Comprehensive Homicide Elimination Strategy Task Force established.

(a)

There is established a Comprehensive Homicide Elimination Strategy Task Force (“Task Force”). The Task Force shall consider the most effective elements of a comprehensive plan that would lead to the elimination of murder in Washington.

(b)

The Task Force shall be comprised of representatives appointed by the Mayor from the government, non-profit organizations, business, schools, victims services organizations, arts, social services, religious, mental health, organized labor, Advisory Neighborhood Commission, and criminology professionals. The Mayor shall designate 2 co-chairs of the Task Force, one each from the government and non-government sectors.

(c)

The Task Force shall hold at least 3 public meetings, and shall present a report to the Mayor and the Council at the end of one year.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 501, 54 DCR 794
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 260 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 260 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).